Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STATE GUARDIAN AD LITEM BOARD.new text end new text begin $6,999,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,366,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the State Guardian Ad Litem Board. Of this amount, $229,000 the first year and $247,000 the second year are for two new supervisory staff. new text end